Illinois, session 104th, HB3278.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 12.8 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/12.8 new)7    Sec. 12.8. Stormwater Pollution Prevention Plan. Within 8one year after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 9104th General Assembly, the Agency shall develop and begin 10implementation of requirements for a Stormwater Pollution 11Prevention Plan or other similar best management practice 12requirements, to be included in National Pollutant Discharge 13Elimination System (NPDES) permits issued to facilities 14regulated under 40 CFR 414 or 40 CFR 463. These requirements 15shall apply to the control of plastic pellets or other 16preproduction plastic materials, in stormwater runoff from 17these facilities.